District of Columbia statutes.
38-1906

Classification of research assistants.

Research assistants shall be classified as teachers for payroll purposes and for retirement purposes.

History

Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 568, ch. 39, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1006.
1973 Ed., § 31-623.